Washington statutes.
RCW 18.19.215

Scope of practice—Agency affiliated counselors.

The scope of practice of registered, certified, and licensed agency affiliated counselors consists exclusively of the following:

(1) Counseling as defined under RCW 18.19.020;

(2) A certified agency affiliated counselor may conduct mental health assessments and make mental health diagnoses which shall be reviewed by a clinical supervisor who is a mental health professional able to independently provide mental health assessments and diagnoses according to the scope of practice of the mental health professional's credential. A certified agency affiliated counselor may not provide clinical supervision; and

(3) A licensed agency affiliated counselor may independently conduct mental health assessments and make mental health diagnoses.

[ 2023 c 425 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 425 ss 1-7, 13-20, and 22-26: See note following RCW 18.83.170.